Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3197.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9-1-50 of the General Laws in Chapter 9-1 entitled "Causes of
Action" is hereby amended to read as follows:
9-1-50. Settled claims not paid within thirty (30) days.
(a) Whenever any claim is settled, the insurance company, adjusting company, or any other
person, firm, or corporation responsible for paying the settlement shall make payment within thirty
(30) days from the date the claimant or the claimant’s attorney sends the release. The signed release
may be transmitted to the party responsible for paying the settlement or their attorney in electronic
format. The signed release may be transmitted to the party responsible for paying the settlement or
their attorney in electronic format. Failure to make payment within thirty (30) days shall raise a
presumption that failure to do so was a willful and wanton disregard for the rights of the claimant.
In addition to all other remedies, the payor shall be liable to the claimant in a separate cause of
action for punitive damages and interest which shall be computed at the rate of twelve percent
(12%) per annum from the date the cause of action giving rise to the settlement occurred until the
judgment on the claim brought pursuant to this section is entered.
(b) Any claim brought under the provisions of this section shall be given a priority on the
trial calendar.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005220
========
LC005220 - Page 2 of 3